Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle B. Voting machines.

§§ 23-15-401 through 23-15-451.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 194, effective from and after July 1, 2017.

§23-15-401. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-1 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-24; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 24; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 118, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-403. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-3 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-01; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 119, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-405. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-5 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-02; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 387, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 120, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-407. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-7 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-03; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 3; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 121, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-409. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-9 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-04; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 4; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 122, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-411. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-11 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-05; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 5; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 123, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-413. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-13 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-06; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 6; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 124, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-415. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-15 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-07; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 7; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 125, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-417. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-17 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-08; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 8; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 126, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-419. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-19 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-09; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 9; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 127, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-421. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-21 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-10; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 10; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 128, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-423. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-23 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-11; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 11; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 129; Laws, 2011, ch. 357, § 1, eff July 28, 2011 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section.)]

§23-15-425. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-25 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-12; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 12; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 130, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-427. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-27 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-13; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 13; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 131, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-429. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-29 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-14; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 14; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 132, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-431. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-31 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-15; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 15; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 133, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-433. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-33 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-16; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 16; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 134, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-435. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-35 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-17; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 17; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 135, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-437. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-37 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-18; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 18; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 136, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-439. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-39 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-19; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 137, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-441. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-41 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-20; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 20; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 138, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-443. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-43 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-21; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 21; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 139, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-445. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-45 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-22; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 22; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 140, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-447. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-47 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-23; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 23; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 141, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-449. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-49 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-25; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 25; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 142, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§23-15-451. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-51 [Codes, 1942, § 3316-26; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 26; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 338]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 143, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]